North Dakota, session 69, SB2169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 43-26.1-11 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. The physical therapist shall communicate the overall plan of care with, and obtain informed
consent from, the patient or the patient's legally authorized representative.

S. B. NO. 2169 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2169.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 4 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State